Florida, session 2026, SB858.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âPresent subsections (9) and (10) of section 29 741.30, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (10) 30 and (11), respectively, a new subsection (9) is added to that 31 section, and paragraph (g) of subsection (6) of that section is 32 amended, to read: 33 741.30âDomestic violence; injunction; powers and duties of 34 court and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary 35 injunction; issuance of injunction; statewide verification 36 system; enforcement; public records exemption.â 37 (6) 38 (g)âA final judgment on injunction for protection against 39 domestic violence entered under this section must, on its face, 40 indicate that it is a violation of s. 790.233, and a first 41 degree misdemeanor, for the respondent to have in his or her 42 care, custody, possession, or control any firearm or ammunition. 43 Upon issuance of a final judgment on injunction for protection 44 against domestic violence, the court shall order the respondent 45 to surrender to the local law enforcement agency all firearms 46 and ammunition owned by the respondent in the respondentâs 47 custody, control, or possession except as provided in paragraph 48 (9)(g), and any license to carry a concealed weapon or firearm 49 issued under s. 790.06, held by the respondent. 50 (9)(a)âUpon issuance of a final judgment on injunction for 51 protection against domestic violence, the law enforcement 52 officer serving the injunction for protection shall request that 53 the respondent immediately surrender all firearms and ammunition 54 owned by the respondent in his or her custody, control, or 55 possession and any license to carry a concealed weapon or 56 firearm issued under s. 790.06, held by the respondent. The law 57 enforcement officer shall take possession of all firearms and 58 ammunition owned by the respondent, except as provided in 59 paragraph (g), and any license to carry a concealed weapon or 60 firearm issued under s. 790.06, held by the respondent, which 61 are surrendered. Alternatively, if personal service by a law 62 enforcement officer is not possible or is not required because 63 the respondent was present at the hearing, the respondent must 64 surrender any firearms and ammunition owned by the respondent, 65 except as provided in paragraph (g), and any license to carry a 66 concealed weapon or firearm issued under s. 790.06, held by the 67 respondent, in a safe manner to the control of the local law 68 enforcement agency immediately after being served with the order 69 by service or immediately after the hearing at which the 70 respondent was present. Notwithstanding ss. 933.02 and 933.18, a 71 law enforcement officer may seek a search warrant from a court 72 of competent jurisdiction to conduct a search for firearms or 73 ammunition owned by the respondent if the officer has probable 74 cause to believe that there are firearms or ammunition owned by 75 the respondent in the respondentâs custody, control, or 76 possession at a particular location which have not been 77 surrendered. 78 (b)âAt the time of surrender, a law enforcement officer 79 taking possession of any firearm or ammunition owned by the 80 respondent, or a license to carry a concealed weapon or firearm 81 issued under s. 790.06, held by the respondent shall issue a 82 receipt identifying all firearms and the quantity and type of 83 ammunition that have been surrendered, and any license 84 surrendered and shall provide a copy of the receipt to the 85 respondent. Within 72 hours after service of the injunction, the 86 law enforcement officer serving the injunction must file the 87 original receipt with the court and ensure that his or her law 88 enforcement agency or office retains a copy of the receipt. 89 (c)âNotwithstanding ss. 933.02 and 933.18, upon the sworn 90 statement or testimony of a law enforcement officer alleging 91 that the respondent has failed to comply with the surrender of 92 firearms or ammunition owned by the respondent, as required by 93 an injunction issued under this section, the court shall 94 determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the 95 respondent has failed to surrender all firearms or ammunition 96 owned by the respondent in the respondentâs custody, control, or 97 possession. If the court finds probable cause that firearms or 98 ammunition owned by the respondent are located in a particular 99 location, the court must issue a search warrant authorizing a 100 search of the location where the firearms or ammunition are 101 located and the seizure of any firearms or ammunition owned by 102 the respondent discovered pursuant to such search. 103 (d)âIf a person other than the respondent claims title to 104 any firearms or ammunition surrendered pursuant to this 105 subsection and he or she is determined by the law enforcement 106 agency to be the lawful owner of the firearm or ammunition, the 107 firearm or ammunition must be returned to him or her, if: 108 1.âThe lawful owner agrees to store the firearm or 109 ammunition in a manner such that the respondent does not have 110 access to or control of the firearm or ammunition. 111 2.âThe firearm or ammunition is not otherwise unlawfully 112 possessed by the owner. 113 (e)âAll law enforcement agencies must develop policies and 114 procedures regarding the acceptance, storage, and return of 115 firearms, ammunition, or licenses required to be surrendered 116 under this section. 117 (f)1.âIf an injunction for protection against domestic 118 violence is vacated, terminated, or otherwise rendered no longer 119 effective by ruling of the court, a law enforcement agency 120 holding a firearm or any ammunition owned by the respondent or a 121 license to carry a concealed weapon or firearm issued under s. 122 790.06, held by the respondent, that has been surrendered or 123 seized pursuant to this subsection must return such surrendered 124 firearm, ammunition, or license to carry a concealed weapon or 125 firearm issued under s. 790.06, as requested by a respondent 126 only after confirming through a background check that the 127 respondent is currently eligible to own or possess firearms and 128 ammunition under federal and state law and after confirming with 129 the court that the injunction has been vacated, terminated, or 130 otherwise rendered no longer effective. 131 2.âIf an injunction for protection against domestic 132 violence is vacated, terminated, or otherwise rendered no longer 133 effective by ruling of the court, the Department of Agriculture 134 and Consumer Services, if it has suspended a license to carry a 135 concealed weapon or firearm pursuant to this subsection, must 136 reinstate such license only after confirming that the respondent 137 is currently eligible to have a license to carry a concealed 138 weapon or firearm pursuant to s. 790.06. 139 3.âA law enforcement agency must provide notice or make a 140 reasonable effort to provide notice to the petitioner. 141 4.âAny firearm and ammunition surrendered by a respondent 142 pursuant to this subsection which remains unclaimed by the 143 lawful owner for 1 year after an injunction has been vacated, 144 terminated, or otherwise rendered no longer effective must be 145 disposed of in accordance with the law enforcement agencyâs 146 policies and procedures for the disposal of firearms in police 147 custody. 148 (g)âA respondent may elect to transfer all firearms and 149 ammunition owned by the respondent that have been surrendered to 150 or seized by a local law enforcement agency pursuant to 151 paragraph (a) to another person who is willing to receive the 152 respondentâs firearms and ammunition. The law enforcement agency 153 must allow such a transfer only if it is determined that the 154 chosen recipient: 155 1.âCurrently is eligible to own or possess a firearm and 156 ammunition under federal and state law after confirmation 157 through a background check. 158 2.âAttests to storing the firearms and ammunition in a 159 manner such that the respondent does not have access to or 160 control of the firearms and ammunition until the injunction 161 against the respondent is vacated, terminated, or otherwise 162 rendered no longer effective by ruling of the court. 163 3.âAttests not to transfer the firearms or ammunition back 164 to the respondent until the injunction against the respondent is 165 vacated, terminated, or otherwise rendered no longer effective 166 by ruling of the court. 167 Section 2.âParagraph (c) of subsection (4) of section 168 741.31, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 169 741.31âViolation of an injunction for protection against 170 domestic violence.â 171 (4) 172 (c)âA person who has a two or more prior conviction 173 convictions for violation of an injunction or a foreign 174 protection order, and who subsequently commits a second or 175 subsequent violation of any injunction or foreign protection 176 order against the same victim, commits a felony of the third 177 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083 or s. 178 775.084. For purposes of this paragraph, the term âconvictionâ 179 means a determination of guilt which is the result of a plea or 180 a trial, regardless of whether adjudication is withheld or a 181 plea of nolo contendere is entered. 182 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.